Nebraska, session 109, LB1159.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1159 LB1159
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 72-728, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
72-728 (1) Except as provided in subsections subsection (2) and (3)
of this section, the Nebraska Hall of Fame Commission shall not name more
than one person to the Nebraska Hall of Fame during each five-year period
beginning on and after January 1, 2005. During the first two years of
each five-year period, the commission shall receive nominations of
candidates to be named to the Nebraska Hall of Fame. The commission shall
review the nominations and may select the finalists for induction. During
the subsequent two years of each five-year period, the commission shall
review the finalists, if any, and shall hold public hearings regarding
the finalists in each of the congressional districts. After the hearings,
the commission may select one finalist for induction. If a finalist is
selected for induction, the commission shall name him or her to the
Nebraska Hall of Fame during the final year of each five-year period. No
individual shall be named to the Nebraska Hall of Fame until at least
thirty-five years after such person's demise.
(2) Notwithstanding the limitations imposed by subsection (1) of
this section, the commission shall procure an appropriate plaque upon
which shall be placed the names of each Nebraskan awarded the Medal of
Honor as a result of such person's services in the armed forces of the
United States. Such plaque shall have sufficient space for listing the
names of persons who shall be awarded the Medal of Honor in the future.
The plaque shall have a suitable place in the State Capitol.
(3) Prior to January 1, 2027, the commission shall name one living
person to the Nebraska Hall of Fame. Such person shall:
(a) Be a prior member of the United States House of Representatives;
(b) Be a former head coach of the University of Nebraska-Lincoln
football team;
(c) Have served as Athletic Director of the University of Nebraska-
Lincoln; and
-2-

LB1159 LB1159
2026 2026
(d) Have attended Hastings High School.
Sec. 2. Original section 72-728, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-